DTC P0193 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]
id0102f1805500
DTC P0193 |
Fuel pressure sensor circuit high input |
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DETECTION CONDITION
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• The PCM monitors the input voltage from the fuel pressure sensor while the engine is running. If the input voltage from the fuel pressure sensor is more than 4.88 V, the PCM determines that there is a malfunction in the fuel pressure sensor circuit.
Diagnostic support note
• The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition in the first drive cycle.
• FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
• The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Fuel pressure sensor malfunction
• Connector or terminal malfunction
• Fuel pressure sensor power and signal circuits are shorted to each other.
• Short to power supply in wiring between fuel pressure sensor terminal B and PCM terminal 48
• Open circuit in wiring between fuel pressure sensor terminal A and PCM terminal 69
• PCM malfunction
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Diagnostic procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
ACTION |
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1
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VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
• Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
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2
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VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
• Verify related Service Information availability.
• Is any related repair information available?
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Yes
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Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available Service Information.
• If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
• Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERN TROUBLESHOOTING”.
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4
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INSPECT FUEL PRESSURE SENSOR CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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5
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INSPECT FUEL PRESSURE SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER SUPPLY
• Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
• Measure the voltage between fuel pressure sensor terminal B (wiring harness-side) and body ground
• Is the voltage more than 4.88 V
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Yes
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Repair or replace harness for short with each other, go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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6
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INSPECT FUEL TEMPERATURE SENSOR
• Inspect the fuel temperature sensor.
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair the supply pump, go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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7
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INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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INSPECT FUEL PRESSURE SENSOR FOR OPEN CIRCUIT
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for continuity between fuel pressure sensor terminal A and PCM terminal 69.
• Is there continuity?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for an open circuit, go to the next step.
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9
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VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0193 COMPLETED
• Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Replace the PCM, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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10
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VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
• Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
• Are any DTCs present?
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Yes
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Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
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No
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Troubleshooting completed.
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